Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-170
Offstreet parking; private parking lot; not subject to eminent domain.

Property now used or hereafter acquired within the boundaries of a city of the second class for offstreet motor vehicle parking by a private operator shall not be subject to condemnation.

Laws 1957, c. 29, § 8, p. 188;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 58.